Illinois, session 104th, HB3468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 104-10, 104-11, 104-13, 104-14, 6104-15, 104-16, 104-17, 104-18, 104-19, 104-20, 104-21, 7104-22, 104-23, 104-24, 104-25, and 104-26 and by adding 8Sections 102-24 and 102-25 as follows: 9    (725 ILCS 5/102-24 new)10    Sec. 102-24. Mental condition or physical condition. 11"Mental condition" or "physical condition" means a condition 12that substantially impairs a person's thought, perception of 13reality, emotional process, judgment, behavior, or ability to 14communicate with counsel, or both, but does not include 15traumatic brain injury, organic brain disease such as dementia 16or Alzheimer's, alcohol or cannabis use, substance use 17disorder, or an abnormality manifested only by repeated 18criminal or otherwise antisocial behavior.  19    (725 ILCS 5/102-25 new)20    Sec. 102-25. Treatment supervisor, supervisor of the 21defendant's treatment, person supervising the defendant's 22treatment, or qualified professional. "Treatment supervisor",   HB3468- 2 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1"supervisor of the defendant's treatment", "person supervising 2the defendant's treatment", or "qualified professional" as 3referenced in Article 104 means the person in charge of 4overseeing fitness restoration for the defendant and may be a 5physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, clinical 6psychologist, nurse practitioner, licensed clinical social 7worker, or nurse who is working under the supervision of a 8properly licensed physician, psychiatrist, or clinical 9psychologist. Persons with any of the above designations are 10deemed qualified to opine on the issue of fitness of the 11defendant.  12    (725 ILCS 5/104-10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-10)13    Sec. 104-10. Presumption of Fitness; Fitness Standard.) A 14defendant is presumed to be fit to stand trial or to plead, and 15be sentenced. A defendant is unfit if, because of the 16defendant's his mental or physical condition, the defendant he 17is unable to either understand the nature and purpose of the 18proceedings against the defendant him or to meaningfully 19assist in the defendant's his defense.20(Source: P.A. 81-1217.) 21    (725 ILCS 5/104-11)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-11)22    Sec. 104-11. Raising Issue; Burden; Fitness Motions.) (a) 23The issue of the defendant's fitness for trial, to plead, or to 24be sentenced may be raised by the defense, the State or the   HB3468- 3 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1Court at any appropriate time before a plea is entered or 2before, during, or after trial. When a bona fide bonafide 3doubt of the defendant's fitness is raised, the court shall 4order a determination of the issue by the county's expert 5before proceeding further.6    However, no order entered pursuant to this subsection 7shall prevent further proceedings in the case. An expert so 8appointed shall examine the defendant and make a report as 9provided in Section 104-15. Upon the filing with the court of a 10verified statement of services rendered, the court shall enter 11an order directed to the county board to pay such expert a 12reasonable fee as stated in the order. 13    (b) (Blank). Upon request of the defendant that a 14qualified expert be appointed to examine him or her to 15determine prior to trial if a bonafide doubt as to his or her 16fitness to stand trial may be raised, the court, in its 17discretion, may order an appropriate examination. However, no 18order entered pursuant to this subsection shall prevent 19further proceedings in the case. An expert so appointed shall 20examine the defendant and make a report as provided in Section 21104-15. Upon the filing with the court of a verified statement 22of services rendered, the court shall enter an order on the 23county board to pay such expert a reasonable fee stated in the 24order.25    (c) When a bona fide bonafide doubt of the defendant's 26fitness has been raised, the burden of proving that the   HB3468- 4 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1defendant is fit by a preponderance of the evidence and the 2burden of going forward with the evidence are on the State. 3However, the court may call its own witnesses and conduct its 4own inquiry.5    (d) Following a finding of unfitness, the court may hear 6and rule on any pretrial motion or motions if the defendant's 7presence is not essential to a fair determination of the 8issues. A motion may be reheard upon a showing that evidence is 9available which was not previously available, due to the 10defendant's unfitness, when the motion was first decided.11(Source: P.A. 81-1217.) 12    (725 ILCS 5/104-13)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-13)13    Sec. 104-13. Fitness examination. 14    (a) When the issue of fitness involves the defendant's 15mental condition, the court shall order an examination of the 16defendant by one or more licensed physicians, clinical 17psychologists, or psychiatrists chosen by the court. No 18physician, or other person clinical psychologist or 19psychiatrist employed by the Department of Human Services 20shall be ordered to perform, in the person's his official 21capacity, an examination under this subsection Section.22    (b) If the issue of fitness involves the defendant's 23physical condition, the court shall appoint one or more 24physicians and in addition, such other experts as it may deem 25appropriate to examine the defendant and to report to the   HB3468- 5 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1court regarding the defendant's condition. No physician or 2other person employed by the Department of Human Services 3shall be ordered to perform, in the person's official 4capacity, an examination under this subsection. 5    (c) An initial fitness examination ordered under this 6Section shall be given at the place designated by the person 7who will conduct the examination, except that if the defendant 8is being held in custody, the examination shall take place at 9such location as the court directs. Unless the person is 10already in the custody of the Department of Human Services, no 11No examinations under this Section shall be ordered to take 12place at mental health or developmental disabilities 13facilities operated by the Department of Human Services. If 14the defendant fails to keep appointments without reasonable 15cause or if the county expert person conducting the 16examination reports to the court that diagnosis requires 17hospitalization or extended observation, the court may order 18the defendant admitted to an appropriate facility for an 19examination, other than an initial fitness examination or 20placement a screening examination, for not more than 7 days. 21The court may, upon a showing of good cause, grant an 22additional 7 days to complete the examination and submit a 23diagnosis to the court.24    (d) Release on pretrial release or on recognizance shall 25not be revoked and an application therefor shall not be denied 26on the grounds that an examination has been ordered, unless   HB3468- 6 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1the court has determined that the defendant must remain in 2custody for the defendant's own safety or the safety of 3others.4    (e) Upon request by the defense and if the defendant is 5indigent, the court may appoint, in addition to the expert or 6experts chosen pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section, a 7qualified expert selected by the defendant to examine the 8defendant him and to make a report as provided in Section 9104-15. Upon the filing with the court of a verified statement 10of services rendered, the court shall enter an order on the 11county board to pay such expert a reasonable fee stated in the 12order.13(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23.) 14    (725 ILCS 5/104-14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-14)15    Sec. 104-14. Use of Statements Made During Examination or 16Treatment.) (a) Statements made by the defendant and 17information gathered in the course of any examination or 18treatment ordered under Section 104-13, 104-17 or 104-20 shall 19not be admissible against the defendant unless the defendant 20he raises the defense of insanity or the defense of drugged or 21intoxicated condition, in which case they shall be admissible 22only on the issue of whether the defendant he was insane, 23drugged, or intoxicated. The refusal of the defendant to 24cooperate in such examinations shall not preclude the raising 25of the aforesaid defenses but shall preclude the defendant   HB3468- 7 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1from offering expert evidence or testimony tending to support 2such defenses if the expert evidence or testimony is based 3upon the expert's examination of the defendant.4    (b) Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section, 5no statement made by the defendant in the course of any 6examination or treatment ordered under Section 104-13, 104-17 7or 104-20, which relates to the crime charged or to other 8criminal acts, shall be disclosed by persons conducting the 9examination or rendering the treatment, except to members of 10the examining or treating team. The defendant, however, may 11consent to the release of such information if the defendant is 12competent to do so. , without the informed written consent of 13the defendant, who is competent at the time of giving such 14consent.15    (c) The court shall advise the defendant of the 16limitations on the use of any statements made or information 17gathered in the course of the fitness examination or 18subsequent treatment as provided in this Section. It shall 19also advise the defendant him that the defendant he may refuse 20to cooperate with the person conducting the examination, but 21that such his refusal may be admitted admissible into evidence 22on the issue of the defendant's his mental or physical 23condition.24(Source: P.A. 81-1217.) 25    (725 ILCS 5/104-15)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-15)  HB3468- 8 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    Sec. 104-15. Initial fitness report Report. 2    (a) The person or persons conducting an initial fitness 3examination of the defendant, pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) 4of Section 104-13 shall submit a written report to the court, 5the State, and the defense within 30 days of the date of the 6order. The report shall include:7        (1) A diagnosis and an explanation as to how it was 8    reached and the facts upon which it is based;9        (2) A description of the defendant's mental or 10    physical disability, if any; its severity; and an opinion 11    as to whether and to what extent it impairs the 12    defendant's ability to understand the nature and purpose 13    of the proceedings against the defendant him or to 14    meaningfully assist in the defendant's his defense, or 15    both.16    (b) A person who, due to any of organic brain disease, 17alcohol or substance use, cannabis use, antisocial personality 18disorder or repeated criminal behavior may not be deemed unfit 19under this Section unless accompanied by a mental health or 20developmental disabilities diagnosis. Unfitness due to a 21mental condition may be found if the defendant would benefit 22from treatment in either a mental health or developmental 23disabilities facility. Unfitness due to a physical condition 24may be found if the defendant would benefit from treatment in a 25medical hospital or other residential care facility or program 26for the rehabilitation of persons with physical disabilities.   HB3468- 9 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    (c) (b) If the report indicates that the defendant is not 2fit to stand trial or to plead because of a disability, the 3report shall include an opinion as to the likelihood of the 4defendant attaining fitness within the statutory a period of 5time from the date of the finding of unfitness if provided with 6a course of treatment. For a defendant charged with a felony, 7the period of time shall be one year. For a defendant charged 8with a Class A or Class B misdemeanor, the period of time shall 9be no longer than the maximum term of imprisonment for the most 10serious offense. Defendants charged with Class C misdemeanors, 11petty offenses, infraction of a municipal ordinance, or 12violation of the Illinois Vehicle Code are not eligible for 13fitness restoration services, unless the penalty may include 14incarceration for a period of 180 days or longer. If the person 15or persons preparing the initial fitness report are unable to 16form such an opinion, the report shall state the reasons 17therefor. The report shall may include a general description 18of the type of treatment needed and of the least physically 19restrictive form of treatment therapeutically appropriate. If 20the most serious charge facing the defendant is a misdemeanor 21and inpatient treatment is recommended, the report shall state 22reasons why outpatient treatment is not appropriate.23    (d) (c) The initial fitness report shall indicate what 24information, if any, contained therein may be harmful to the 25mental condition of the defendant if made known to the 26defendant and the court may determine if the defendant is   HB3468- 10 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1restricted from receiving the report. him.2    (e) (d) In addition to the report, a person retained or 3appointed by the court State or the defense to conduct an 4initial fitness examination under Section 104-13 shall, upon 5written request, make the defendant's his or her notes, other 6evaluations reviewed or relied upon by the testifying witness, 7and any videotaped interviews available to another examiner of 8the defendant. All forensic interviews conducted by a person 9retained or appointed by the court State or the defense shall 10be videotaped unless doing so would be impractical. In the 11event that the interview is not videotaped, the examiner may 12still testify as to the person's fitness and the court may only 13consider the lack of compliance in according the weight and 14not the admissibility of the expert testimony. An examiner may 15use these materials as part of the defendant's his or her 16diagnosis and explanation but shall not otherwise disclose the 17contents, including at a hearing before the court, except as 18otherwise provided in Section 104-14 of this Code. 19(Source: P.A. 100-424, eff. 1-1-18.) 20    (725 ILCS 5/104-16)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-16)21    Sec. 104-16. Fitness Hearing.)     (a) The court court 22shall conduct a hearing to determine the issue of the 23defendant's fitness within 45 days of receipt of the final 24written report of the person or persons conducting the 25examination or upon conclusion of the matter then pending   HB3468- 11 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1before it, subject to continuances allowed pursuant to Section 2114-4 of this Act.3    (b) Subject to the rules of evidence, matters admissible 4on the issue of the defendant's fitness include, but are not 5limited to, the following:6    (1) The defendant's knowledge and understanding of the 7charge, the proceedings, the consequences of a plea, judgment 8or sentence, and the functions of the participants in the 9trial process;10    (2) The defendant's ability to observe, recollect and 11relate occurrences, especially those concerning the incidents 12alleged, and to effectively communicate with counsel;13    (3) The defendant's social behavior and abilities; 14orientation as to time and place; recognition of persons, 15places and things; and performance of motor processes.16    (c) The defendant has the right to be present at every 17hearing on the issue of his fitness. The defendant's presence 18may be waived only if there is filed with the court a 19certificate stating that the defendant is physically unable to 20be present due to a disability and the reasons therefor. The 21certificate shall be signed by a licensed physician, physician 22assistant, or nurse practitioner who, within 7 days, has 23examined the defendant. A disability is a mental or physical 24condition that, in the opinion of a physician, physician 25assistant, or nurse practitioner, prevents the defendant from 26safely attending a hearing in person. The defendant's mere   HB3468- 12 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1refusal to attend a hearing shall not by itself constitute a 2disability, regardless of the person's mental state. 3    (d) On the basis of the evidence before it, the court or 4jury shall determine whether the defendant is fit to stand 5trial, or to plead, or to be sentenced. If it finds that the 6defendant is unfit, the court or the jury shall determine 7whether there is substantial probability that the defendant, 8if provided with a course of treatment, will attain fitness 9within one year, except if the defendant is facing either a 10Class A or B misdemeanors, in which case the period of time 11shall be no longer than the maximum for the most serious 12offense. If the court or the jury finds that there is not a 13substantial probability, the court shall proceed as provided 14in Section 104-23. If such probability is found or if the court 15or the jury is unable to determine whether a substantial 16probability exists, the court shall order the defendant to 17undergo treatment for the purpose of rendering the defendant 18him fit. In the event that a defendant is ordered to undergo 19treatment with when there has been no initial determination as 20to the probability of his attaining fitness within the 21statutory timeframe, the court shall conduct a hearing as soon 22as possible following the receipt of the treatment 23supervisor's report filed pursuant to subsection (g) paragraph 24(d) of Section 104-17, unless the hearing is waived by the 25defense, and shall make a determination as to whether a 26substantial probability of attaining fitness within the   HB3468- 13 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1statutory timeframe exists. If the court or the jury finds 2that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant 3may be rendered fit within the statutory limitations, the 4court shall proceed as provided in Section 104-23. 5    (e) An order finding the defendant unfit is a final order 6for purposes of appeal by the State or the defendant.7(Source: P.A. 81-1217.) 8    (725 ILCS 5/104-17)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-17)9    Sec. 104-17. Commitment for treatment; treatment plan. 10    (a) If the defendant is eligible to be or has been released 11on pretrial release or on the defendant's his own 12recognizance, the court shall select the least physically 13restrictive form of treatment therapeutically appropriate and 14consistent with the safety of the defendant or the safety of 15others. treatment plan. The treatment placement may be ordered 16on either on an inpatient or an outpatient basis. 17    (b) If the defendant defendant's is unfit due to mental 18illness or developmental disability as identified in the 19Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code disability 20is mental, the court may order the defendant into the him 21placed for secure treatment in the custody of the Department 22of Human Services. , or The the court may also order the 23defendant to be him placed in the custody of any other 24appropriate public or private mental health facility or 25treatment program which has agreed to provide treatment to the   HB3468- 14 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1defendant. If the defendant is remanded to the custody of the 2Department of Human Services for inpatient services, the 3defendant shall be placed in a secure setting. During the 4period of time required to determine bed and placement 5availability at the designated facility, the defendant shall 6remain in jail and the pretrial release provisions of Section 7110-2 do not apply. If the most serious charge faced by the 8defendant is a Class A or Class B misdemeanor, the court shall 9order outpatient treatment, unless the court finds good cause 10on the record to order secure, inpatient treatment. If the 11court orders the defendant to inpatient treatment in the 12custody of the Department of Human Services, the Department 13shall conduct a placement screening evaluate the defendant to 14determine the most appropriate placement option for secure 15facility to receive the defendant and, within 20 days of the 16successful transmittal by the clerk of the circuit court of 17the court's placement order, if inpatient treatment is most 18appropriate, notify the court, the State and the defense court 19of the designated secure facility to receive the defendant. In 20such case, the The Department shall admit the defendant to a 21secure facility within 60 days of the transmittal of the 22court's remand court's placement order, unless the Department 23can demonstrate good faith efforts at placement and a lack of 24bed and placement availability. If placement cannot be made 25within 60 days of successful the transmittal of the court's 26remand court's placement order and the Department has   HB3468- 15 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1demonstrated good faith efforts at placement and a lack of bed 2and placement availability, the Department shall provide the 3court, the State, and the defense with an update and shall 4continue an update to update the ordering court, the State and 5the defense court every 30 days thereafter until the defendant 6is placed. Once bed and placement availability is determined, 7the Department shall notify the sheriff who shall promptly 8transport the defendant to the designated facility. If the 9defendant is placed in the custody of the Department of Human 10Services, the defendant shall be placed in a secure setting. 11During the period of time required to determine bed and 12placement availability at the designated facility, the 13defendant shall remain in jail. If during the course of 14screening evaluating the defendant for placement, the 15Department of Human Services determines that the defendant is 16currently fit to stand trial, suitable for outpatient 17treatment, or unfit without a substantial probability of being 18rendered fit within the statutory timeframe, it shall 19immediately notify the court, the State, and the defense court 20and shall submit a written report within 7 days. In any of 21those circumstances, that circumstance the placement shall be 22held pending a court hearing on the Department's report. 23Otherwise, upon completion of the placement process, including 24identifying bed and placement availability, the sheriff shall 25be notified and shall transport the defendant to the 26designated facility. If, within 60 days of the successful   HB3468- 16 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1transmittal by the clerk of the circuit court of the court's 2remand court's placement order, the Department has not 3provided the court fails to provide the sheriff with notice of 4bed and placement availability at the designated facility, the 5sheriff shall contact the Department to inquire about when a 6placement will become available at the designated facility as 7well as bed and placement availability at other secure 8facilities. The Department shall respond to the sheriff within 92 business days of the notice and inquiry by the sheriff 10seeking the transfer and the Department shall provide the 11sheriff with the status of the placement screening, currently 12designated facility evaluation, information on bed and 13placement availability, and an estimated date of admission for 14the defendant, and any changes to the that estimated date of 15admission. If the Department notifies the sheriff during the 2 16business day period of an alternate secure a facility operated 17by the Department with current placement availability, the 18sheriff shall promptly transport the defendant to that 19facility. The placement may be ordered either on an inpatient 20or an outpatient basis.21    (c) If the defendant's disability is physical, the court 22may order placement at a medical hospital or other residential 23care facility or program that has agreed to provide treatment 24to the defendant. Only such physical conditions that may be 25overcome by special assistance or provisions as referenced in 26Section 104-22 qualify as physical disabilities under this   HB3468- 17 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1subsection. him placed under the supervision of the Department 2of Human Services which shall place and maintain the defendant 3in a suitable treatment facility or program, or the court may 4order him placed in an appropriate public or private facility 5or treatment program which has agreed to provide treatment to 6the defendant. The placement may be ordered either on an 7inpatient or an outpatient basis.8    (d) If the defendant with mental disabilities is ordered 9to outpatient treatment, the defendant shall be released from 10custody with instructions to contact the Department of Human 11Services to schedule the receipt of restoration services in 12the community. A defendant who either fails to arrange for the 13receipt of community restoration services or whom the 14Department reports has failed to comply in any other respect 15with the outpatient treatment order shall be remanded to the 16Department pursuant to subsection (b) hereof to receive 17inpatient services at a secure facility designated by the 18Department.19    (e) If the defendant is unfit due to any condition other 20than a mental or physical condition as defined in Section 21102-24, the court may order the defendant placed in a suitable 22public or private treatment facility or program that has 23agreed to provide treatment to the defendant. No person who 24has not been determined to be unfit due to a mental or physical 25condition identified in Section 102-24 may be placed in a 26facility operated by the Department of Human Services.   HB3468- 18 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    (f) (d) The clerk of the circuit court shall within 5 days 2of the entry of the order transmit to the Department, 3hospital, facility, agency or program institution, if any, to 4which the defendant is remanded for treatment, the following:5        (1) a certified copy of the order to undergo 6    treatment. Accompanying the certified copy of the order to 7    undergo treatment shall be the complete copy of any 8    initial fitness report prepared under Section 104-15 of 9    this Code or other report prepared by a forensic examiner 10    for the court;11        (2) the county and municipality in which the offense 12    was committed;13        (3) the county and municipality in which the arrest 14    took place;15        (4) a copy of the arrest report, criminal charges, 16    arrest record; and 17        (5) an order authorizing the Department, hospital, 18    facility or program to contact and receive information 19    from prior and current treatment providers and the 20    defendant's family concerning prior admissions, treatment, 21    medications and behaviors; and 22        (6) (5) all additional matters which the Court directs 23    the clerk to transmit.24    (g) (e) Within 30 days of admission to the hospital, 25facility or program designated under this Section facility, 26the person supervising the defendant's treatment shall submit   HB3468- 19 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1to file with the court, the State, and the defense a report 2assessing the hospital's, facility's or program's capacity to 3provide appropriate treatment for the defendant and indicating 4an his opinion as to the probability of the defendant's 5attaining fitness within a period of time from the date of the 6finding of unfitness. For a defendant charged with a felony, 7the period of time shall be one year. For a defendant charged 8with a Class A or Class B misdemeanor, the period of time shall 9be no longer than the sentence if convicted of the most serious 10offense. Defendants charged with Class C misdemeanors, petty 11offenses, infraction of a municipal ordinance, or violation of 12the Illinois Vehicle Code are not eligible for fitness 13restoration services, unless the statutory penalty therefor 14may include a sentence for a period of 180 days or longer. If 15the report indicates that there is a substantial probability 16that the defendant will attain fitness within the statutory 17time period, the treatment supervisor shall also submit file a 18treatment plan which shall include:19        (1) A diagnosis of the defendant's disability;20        (2) A description of treatment goals with respect to 21    rendering the defendant fit, a specification of the 22    proposed treatment modalities, and an estimated timetable 23    for attainment of the goals;24        (3) An identification of the person in charge of 25    supervising the defendant's treatment.26(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.)   HB3468- 20 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    (725 ILCS 5/104-18)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-18)2    Sec. 104-18. Progress reports. 3    (a) The treatment supervisor shall submit a written 4progress report to the court, the State, and the defense:5        (1) At least 7 days prior to the date for any hearing 6    on the issue of the defendant's fitness, provided the 7    treatment supervisor has been notified by the court of 8    such date sufficiently in advance;;9        (2) Whenever the treatment supervisor he believes that 10    the defendant has attained fitness;11        (3) Whenever there is an opinion by the treatment 12    supervisor he believes that there is not a substantial 13    probability that the defendant will attain fitness, with 14    treatment, within the statutory time period set in 15    subsection (e) of Section 104-17 of this Code from the 16    date of the original finding of unfitness.17    (b) The progress report shall contain:18        (1) The clinical findings of the treatment supervisor 19    and the facts upon which the findings are based;20        (2) The opinion of the treatment supervisor as to 21    whether the defendant has attained fitness, or as to 22    whether the defendant is making progress, under treatment, 23    toward attaining fitness within the statutory time period 24    set in subsection (e) of Section 104-17 of this Code from 25    the date of the original finding of unfitness, or there is   HB3468- 21 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    not a substantially probability that the defendant will 2    attain fitness within the statutory time period;3        (3) If the defendant is receiving medication, 4    information from the prescribing physician indicating the 5    type, the dosage and the effect of the medication on the 6    defendant's appearance, actions and demeanor.7    (c) Whenever the court is sent a report from the 8supervisor of the defendant's treatment under either paragraph 9(2) or (3) of subsection (a) of this Section it shall, within 1048 hours, enter an order upon the sheriff to return the 11defendant to the county jail. Upon receipt of such order, the 12treatment supervisor provider shall arrange directly with the 13county sheriff jail for the immediate return of the defendant 14to the county jail as provided under subsection (e) of Section 15104-20 of this Code.16    (d) Whenever the court receives a report from the 17defendant's treatment supervisor pursuant to paragraph (2) or 18(3) of subsection (a), the court shall forthwith set the 19matter for a first hearing within 14 days, unless good cause is 20demonstrated why the hearing cannot be held within that time 21and shall set the hearing at the first available opportunity 22thereafter. 23(Source: P.A. 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 100-27, eff. 1-1-18.) 24    (725 ILCS 5/104-19)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-19)25    Sec. 104-19. Records.) Any report submitted to filed of   HB3468- 22 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1record with the court concerning diagnosis, treatment or 2treatment plans made pursuant to this Article shall not be 3placed in the defendant's court record, but shall be 4maintained separately by the clerk of the court and shall be 5available only to the court or an appellate court, the State 6and the defense, the Department, a hospital, facility or 7program which is providing treatment to the defendant pursuant 8to an order of the court or such other persons as the court may 9direct.10(Source: P.A. 81-1217.) 11    (725 ILCS 5/104-20)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-20)12    Sec. 104-20. Ninety-day hearings; continuing treatment.)13    (a) Upon entry or continuation of any order to undergo 14fitness restoration treatment, the court shall set a date for 15hearing to reexamine the issue of the defendant's fitness not 16more than 90 days from the original finding of unfitness and at 1790-day intervals thereafter. The clerk of the circuit court 18shall notify the hospital, facility or program providing 19treatment to the defendant of all upcoming hearing dates. In 20addition, whenever the court receives a report from the 21supervisor of the defendant's treatment pursuant to 22subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of Section 104-18, the court 23shall forthwith set the matter for a first hearing within 14 24days unless good cause is demonstrated why the hearing cannot 25be held. Unless waived by the defense, on On the date set or   HB3468- 23 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1upon conclusion of the matter then pending before it, the 2court, sitting without a jury, shall conduct a hearing, unless 3waived by the defense, and shall determine:4        (1) Whether the defendant is fit to stand trial or to 5    plead; or and if not,6        (2) Whether the defendant is making progress under 7    treatment toward attainment of fitness within the 8    statutory time period set in subsection (e) of Section 9    104-17 of this Code from the date of the original finding 10    of unfitness; or .11        (3) Whether there is not a substantial probability 12    that the defendant may be restored to fitness within the 13    statutory timeframe. 14    (b) If the court finds the defendant to be fit pursuant to 15this Section, the court shall set the matter for trial and if 16in secure custody, order that the defendant be returned to the 17county to stand trial. ; provided that if the defendant is in 18need of continued care or treatment and the supervisor of the 19defendant's treatment agrees to continue to provide it, the 20court may enter any order it deems appropriate for the 21continued care or treatment of the defendant by the facility 22or program pending the conclusion of the criminal proceedings.23    (c) If the court finds that the defendant is still unfit 24but that the defendant he is making progress toward attaining 25fitness, the court may continue or modify the its original 26treatment order entered pursuant to Section 104-17.  HB3468- 24 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    (d) If the court finds that the defendant is still unfit 2and that the defendant he is not making progress toward 3attaining fitness such that there is not a substantial 4probability that the defendant he will attain fitness within 5the time statutory period set in subsection (e) of Section 6104-17 of this Code from the date of the original finding of 7unfitness, if in secure custody, the court shall order that 8the defendant be returned to the county and shall otherwise 9proceed pursuant to Section 104-23. However, if the defendant 10is in need of continued care and treatment and the supervisor 11of the defendant's treatment agrees to continue to provide it, 12the court may enter any order it deems appropriate for the 13continued care or treatment by the facility or program pending 14the conclusion of the criminal proceedings.15    (e) Whenever the court receives a report from the 16supervisor of the defendant's treatment under paragraph (2) or 17(3) of subsection (a) of Section 104-18 of this Code, the court 18shall, within 48 hours, immediately enter an order directing 19the sheriff to return the defendant to the county jail and set 20the matter for trial. At any time thereafter, the issue of the 21defendant's fitness can be raised again under Section 104-11 22of this Code. If the court finds that the defendant is still 23unfit after being recommended as fit by the supervisor of the 24defendant's treatment and, that it is substantially probable 25that the defendant may be restored to fitness within the 26statutory timeframe, the court shall attach a copy of any   HB3468- 25 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1written report that identifies the relevant factors in favor 2thereof the finding that the defendant continues to be unfit, 3prepared by a licensed physician, clinical psychologist, or 4psychiatrist, to the court order remanding the person for 5further treatment. 6(Source: P.A. 99-140, eff. 1-1-16; 100-27, eff. 1-1-18.) 7    (725 ILCS 5/104-21)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-21)8    Sec. 104-21. Medication. 9    (a) A defendant who is ordered into the custody of the 10Department of Human Services after a finding of unfitness is 11subject to the involuntary administration of medication under 12Section 2-107.1 of the Mental Health and Developmental 13Disabilities Code. The petition may be filed in either the 14county where the defendant is located or with the court having 15jurisdiction over the defendant. A defendant receiving 16psychotropic drugs shall not be presumed to be unfit to stand 17trial solely by virtue of the receipt of those drugs or 18medications.19    (a-5) The court-ordered custodian of a defendant who is 20subject to the involuntary administration of medication under 21this Section shall be entitled to receive the treatment notes, 22records, and reports relative to the defendant upon written 23request. A prior treatment provider who is provided with a 24copy of the court's custody order shall respond to the 25custodian's records request within 5 business days. No records   HB3468- 26 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1received pursuant to this Section may be used for any purposes 2except to determine whether the defendant meets the criteria 3for court-ordered treatment under Section 2-107.1 or to 4prepare for and participate in hearings under Section 2-107.1. 5    (a-7) A petition filed on behalf of a defendant who is in 6custody under this Article shall be heard within 7 days, 7unless good cause is stated on the record why the hearing 8cannot be so held within the statutory timeframe. In no event, 9however, shall such hearing be delayed beyond 14 days from the 10date the petition is filed. The court shall adjudicate the 11petition within 3 working days of the conclusion of the 12medication hearing. 13    (b) Whenever a defendant who is receiving medication under 14medical direction is transferred between a place of custody 15and a treatment facility or program, a written report from the 16prescribing physician shall accompany the defendant. The 17report shall state the type and dosage of the defendant's 18medication and the duration of the prescription. The chief 19officer of the place of custody or the treatment supervisor at 20the facility or program shall ensure insure that such 21medication is provided according to the directions of the 22prescribing physician or until superseded by order of a 23physician who has examined the defendant.24    (c) (Blank). If a defendant refuses psychotropic 25medication, it may be administered over the defendant's 26objections in accord with the Mental Health and Developmental   HB3468- 27 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1Disabilities Code. If court authorized medications are sought, 2the petition, prepared in accord with Section 2-107.1 of the 3Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code may be filed 4in the county where the defendant is located or with the court 5having jurisdiction over the defendant. 6(Source: P.A. 98-1025, eff. 8-22-14.) 7    (725 ILCS 5/104-22)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-22)8    Sec. 104-22. Trial with special provisions and 9assistance.) (a) On motion of the defendant, the State or on 10the court's own accord motion, the court shall determine 11whether special provisions or assistance will render the 12defendant fit to stand trial as defined in Section 104-10.13    (b) Such special provisions or assistance may include but 14are not limited to:15        (1) The administration of medication. 16        (2) (1) Appointment of qualified translators who shall 17    simultaneously translate all testimony at trial into 18    language understood by the defendant.19        (3) (2) Appointment of experts qualified to assist a 20    defendant who because of a disability is unable to 21    understand the proceedings or communicate with the 22    defendant's his or her attorney.23    (c) The case may proceed to trial only if the court 24determines that such provisions or assistance compensate for a 25defendant's disabilities so as to render the defendant fit as   HB3468- 28 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1defined in Section 104-10. In such cases the court shall state 2for the record the following:3    (1) The qualifications and experience of the experts or 4other persons appointed to provide special assistance to the 5defendant;6    (2) The court's reasons for selecting or appointing the 7particular experts or other persons to provide the special 8assistance to the defendant;9    (3) How the appointment of the particular expert or other 10persons will serve the goal of rendering the defendant fit in 11view of the appointee's qualifications and experience, taken 12in conjunction with the particular disabilities of the 13defendant; and14    (4) Any other factors considered by the court in 15determining that the defendant is fit with special provisions 16or assistance. appointing that individual.17(Source: P.A. 81-1217.) 18    (725 ILCS 5/104-23)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-23)19    Sec. 104-23. Unfit defendants. Cases involving an unfit 20defendant who demands a discharge hearing or a defendant whom 21the defendant's treatment supervisor has reported as unfit 22without a substantial probability of attaining fitness within 23the statutory time period who cannot become fit to stand trial 24and for whom no special provisions or assistance can 25compensate for the defendant's his disability and render the   HB3468- 29 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1defendant him fit shall proceed in the following manner:2    (a) Upon a determination that there is not a substantial 3probability that the defendant will attain fitness within the 4time period set in subsection (e) of Section 104-17 of this 5Code from the original finding of unfitness, the court The 6court shall hold a discharge hearing within 14 60 days, unless 7good cause is shown for the delay.8    (b) If at the hearing at any time the court determines that 9there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will 10attain fitness become fit to stand trial or to plead within the 11statutory time period it shall proceed as follows: set in 12subsection (e) of Section 104-17 of this Code from the date of 13the original finding of unfitness, or if at the end of the time 14period set in subsection (e) of Section 104-17 of this Code 15from that date the court finds the defendant still unfit and 16for whom no special provisions or assistance can compensate 17for his disabilities and render him fit, the State shall 18request the court:19        (1) To set the matter for a discharge hearing pursuant 20    to Section 104-25 104-25 unless a hearing has already been 21    held pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section; or22        (2) To release the defendant from custody and to 23    dismiss with prejudice the charges against the defendant 24    him; or25        (3) To remand the defendant to the custody of the 26    Department of Human Services and order an involuntary   HB3468- 30 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    civil commitment a hearing to be conducted pursuant to the 2    provisions of the Mental Health and Developmental 3    Disabilities Code, as now or hereafter amended. The 4    Department of Human Services shall have 7 days from the 5    date it receives the defendant assess the individual and 6    if warranted, to prepare and file the necessary petition 7    and certificates that are required for commitment on an 8    inpatient or outpatient basis under the Mental Health and 9    Developmental Disabilities Code subject to a 7 day 10    extension upon a showing of good cause. If the defendant 11    is committed to the Department of Human Services pursuant 12    to such hearing, the court having jurisdiction over the 13    criminal matter shall dismiss the charges against the 14    defendant, with the leave to reinstate. In such cases the 15    Department of Human Services shall notify the court, the 16    State's attorney and the defense attorney upon the 17    discharge of the defendant. A former defendant so 18    committed shall be otherwise treated in the same manner as 19    any other civilly committed patient for all purposes 20    including admission, selection of the place of treatment 21    and the treatment modalities, entitlement to rights and 22    privileges, transfer, and discharge. If the defendant does 23    not qualify for involuntary commitment, but has expressed 24    a willingness to be admitted on a voluntary basis and the 25    facility director determines that the defendant is 26    clinically suitable for voluntary admission, the   HB3468- 31 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    Department shall so advise the court, the State, and the 2    defense. The court may consider this factor in determining 3    whether to proceed under subparagraph (1) or (2) of 4    paragraph (b) of this Section. Should the court dismiss 5    with prejudice the charges against the defendant, the 6    defendant shall then be admission to the Department on a 7    voluntary basis pursuant to the Mental Health and 8    Developmental Disabilities Code. If a defendant who does 9    not qualify for involuntary commitment is unwilling or 10    unsuitable for voluntary admission, the Department shall 11    so advise the court, the State and the defense. Upon 12    receipt of such a notice, the court A defendant who is not 13    committed shall, within 48 hours, enter an order for the 14    sheriff to transport the defendant to the county jail be 15    remanded to the court having jurisdiction of the criminal 16    matter for further disposition pursuant to subparagraph 17    (1) or (2) of paragraph (b) of this Section.18    (c) Where charges have not been dismissed with prejudice, 19if If the defendant is later restored to fitness and the 20original charges against him are reinstated, the speedy trial 21provisions of Section 103-5 shall commence to run.22(Source: P.A. 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.) 23    (725 ILCS 5/104-24)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-24)24    Sec. 104-24. Time Credit. Time spent in custody pursuant 25to orders issued under this Article Section 104-17 or 104-20   HB3468- 32 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1or pursuant to a commitment to the Department of Human 2Services following a finding of unfitness or incompetency 3under prior law, shall be credited against any sentence 4imposed on the defendant in the pending criminal case or in any 5other case arising out of the same conduct. The court shall 6calculate the time credit to be applied when considering the 7maximum period of time that a defendant may remain in custody. 8The Department of Human Services shall not be authorized to 9independently apply or calculate time credit. 10(Source: P.A. 89-507, eff. 7-1-97.) 11    (725 ILCS 5/104-25)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-25)12    Sec. 104-25. Discharge hearing. 13    (a) As provided for in paragraph (a) of Section 104-23 and 14subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of Section 104-23 a hearing 15to determine the sufficiency of the evidence shall be held. 16Such hearing shall be conducted by the court without a jury. 17The State and the defendant may introduce evidence relevant to 18the question of defendant's guilt of the crime charged.19    The court may admit hearsay or affidavit evidence on 20secondary matters such as testimony to establish the chain of 21possession of physical evidence, laboratory reports, 22authentication of transcripts taken by official reporters, 23court and business records, and public documents.24    (b) If the evidence presented by the State does not prove 25the defendant guilty beyond a reasonable doubt, the court   HB3468- 33 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1shall enter a judgment of acquittal; however nothing herein 2shall prevent the State from requesting the court to commit 3the defendant to the Department of Human Services under the 4provisions of the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 5Code.6    (c) If after considering the evidence, the defendant is 7found not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall enter a 8judgment of acquittal and the proceedings after acquittal by 9reason of insanity under Section 5-2-4 of the Unified Code of 10Corrections shall apply.11    (d) If the discharge hearing does not result in an 12acquittal of the charge under subsection (b) or (c), the 13defendant may be remanded for further treatment and the 14statutory one year time limit for restoration set forth in 15Section 104-23 shall be extended as follows: 16        (1) If the most serious charge upon which the State 17    sustained its burden of proof was a Class 1 or Class X 18    felony, the treatment period may be extended up to a 19    maximum treatment period of 2 years;20        (1.1) If the most serious charge upon which the State 21    sustained its burden of proof was if a Class 2, 3, or 4 22    felony, the treatment period may be extended up to a 23    maximum of 15 months; 24        (2) If the State sustained its burden of proof on a 25    charge of first degree murder, the treatment period may be 26    extended up to a maximum treatment period of 5 years.  HB3468- 34 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1        (3) Defendants facing misdemeanor charges are not 2    subject to extension of the treatment period unless they 3    are also facing felony charges on the same conduct. 4    (e) Transcripts of testimony taken at a discharge hearing 5may be admitted in evidence at a subsequent trial of the case, 6subject to the rules of evidence, if the witness who gave such 7testimony is legally unavailable at the time of the subsequent 8trial.9    (f) If the court fails to enter an order of acquittal the 10defendant may appeal from such judgment in the same manner 11provided for an appeal from a conviction in a criminal case.12    (g) At the expiration of an extended period of treatment 13ordered pursuant to subsection (d) of this Section: 14        (1) Upon a finding that the defendant is fit or can be 15    rendered fit consistent with special provisions or 16    assistance pursuant to Section 104-22 if in custody, the 17    court shall, within 48 hours, order the sheriff to return 18    the defendant to the county and the court may otherwise 19    proceed with trial. 20        (2) If the defendant continues to be unfit to stand 21    trial, the court shall determine whether the defendant he 22    or she is subject to involuntary admission under the 23    Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code or 24    constitutes a serious threat to the public safety. If so 25    found, the defendant shall be remanded to the Department 26    of Human Services for further treatment and shall be   HB3468- 35 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    treated in the same manner as a civilly committed patient 2    for all purposes, except that the defendant shall be 3    placed in a secure setting unless the court determines 4    that there are compelling reasons why such placement is 5    not necessary. In addition, the criminal original court 6    having jurisdiction over the defendant shall be required 7    to approve any conditional release or discharge of the 8    defendant, for the period of commitment equal to the 9    maximum sentence to which the defendant would have been 10    subject had the defendant he or she been convicted in the 11    underlying a criminal proceeding. The court shall 12    calculate the maximum period of civil commitment under 13    this subsection and no credits may be applied against such 14    term other than those considered and applied by the court. 15    During this period of commitment, the original court 16    having jurisdiction over the defendant shall hold hearings 17    under clause (i) of this paragraph (2). However, if the 18    defendant is remanded to the Department of Human Services, 19    the defendant shall be placed in a secure setting unless 20    the court determines that there are compelling reasons why 21    such placement is not necessary. 22        If the defendant does not have a current treatment 23    plan, then within 3 days of admission under this 24    subsection subdivision (g)(2), the defendant's treatment 25    supervisor shall submit a treatment plan to the court, the 26    State, and the defense shall be prepared for each   HB3468- 36 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    defendant and entered into his or her record. The plan 2    shall include (i) an assessment of the defendant's 3    treatment needs, (ii) a description of the services 4    recommended for treatment, (iii) the goals of each type of 5    element of service, (iv) an anticipated timetable for the 6    accomplishment of the goals, and (v) a designation of the 7    qualified professional responsible for the implementation 8    of the plan. The plan shall be reviewed and updated as the 9    clinical condition warrants, but not less than every 30 10    days. 11        Every 90 days after the entry of an initial admission 12    order under this subsection subdivision (g)(2), the 13    defendant's treatment supervisor facility director shall 14    submit file a progress typed treatment plan report to the 15    court, the State, and the defense with the original court 16    having jurisdiction over the defendant. The report shall 17    include an opinion as to whether the defendant is: (i) fit 18    to stand trial, or (ii) if not, and whether the defendant 19    is currently subject to involuntary admission. If so, the 20    treatment supervisor shall also state whether the 21    defendant is , in need of mental health services on an 22    inpatient basis, or in need of mental health services on 23    an outpatient basis. The report shall also summarize the 24    basis for those findings and provide a current summary of 25    the 5 items required in a treatment plan. A copy of the 26    report shall be forwarded to the clerk of the circuit   HB3468- 37 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    court to be filed in accordance with Section 104-19 with a 2    copy provided to the State and the defense, if the 3    defendant is represented by counsel. If the report states 4    that the defendant is fit to stand trial, the court shall 5    conduct a fitness hearing. If the defendant is found fit, 6    the court shall, within 48 hours, order the county sheriff 7    to return the defendant to the county jail to stand trial.8        Upon request of the defendant's treatment supervisor, 9the State, the defense, or on the court's court, the State's 10Attorney, and the defendant's attorney if the defendant is 11represented by counsel. The court on its own motion, it may 12order a hearing to review the treatment plan. The defendant or 13the State's Attorney may request a treatment plan review every 1490 days and the court shall review the current treatment plan 15to determine whether the plan complies with the requirements 16of this Section. The court may also order an independent 17examination of the defendant on its own initiative or at the 18request of and shall order such an evaluation if either the 19defense recipient or the State State's Attorney so requests 20and has demonstrated to the court that the plan cannot be 21effectively reviewed by the court without such an examination. 22Under no circumstances shall the court be required to order an 23independent examination pursuant to this Section. However, if 24it does, it may not do so more than once each 12-month period 25year. The examination shall be conducted by a psychiatrist or 26clinical psychologist as defined in Section 1-103 of the   HB3468- 38 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code who is not 2in the employ of the Department of Human Services. 3        If, during the period within which the defendant is 4    confined in a secure setting, the court enters an order 5    that requires the defendant to appear, the court shall 6    timely transmit a copy of the order or writ to the director 7    of the hospital, particular Department of Human Services 8    facility or program providing services to the defendant 9    where the defendant resides authorizing the transportation 10    of the defendant to the court for the purpose of the 11    hearing. 12            (i) 180 days after a defendant is remanded to the 13        Department of Human Services, under paragraph (2) of 14        subsection (g) paragraph (2), and every 180 days 15        thereafter for so long as the defendant is confined 16        under the order entered thereunder, the court shall 17        set a hearing and shall direct that notice of the time 18        and place of the hearing be served upon the defendant, 19        the facility director, the State's Attorney, and the 20        defendant's attorney. If requested by either the State 21        or the defense or if the court determines that it is 22        appropriate, an impartial examination of the defendant 23        by a psychiatrist or clinical psychologist as defined 24        in Section 1-103 of the Mental Health and 25        Developmental Disabilities Code who is not in the 26        employ of the Department of Human Services shall be   HB3468- 39 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1        ordered, and the report considered at the time of the 2        hearing. If the defendant is not currently represented 3        by counsel, the court shall appoint the public 4        defender to represent the defendant at the hearing. 5        The court shall make a finding as to whether the 6        defendant is: (A) subject to involuntary admission 7        and, if so, whether the defendant is ; or (B) in need of 8        mental health services in the form of inpatient care; 9        or (C) in need of mental health services on an 10        outpatient basis but not subject to involuntary 11        admission nor inpatient care. 12        The findings of the court shall be established by 13        clear and convincing evidence and the burden of proof 14        and the burden of going forward with the evidence 15        shall rest with the State State's Attorney. The court 16        Upon finding by the court, the court shall enter its 17        findings on and an appropriate order. 18            (ii) The terms "subject to involuntary admission", 19        "in need of mental health services in the form of 20        inpatient care" and "in need of mental health services 21        on an outpatient basis but not subject to involuntary 22        admission nor inpatient care" shall have the meanings 23        ascribed to them in clause (a-1) (d)(3) of Section 24        5-2-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 25        (3) If the defendant is not committed pursuant to this 26    Section, the defendant he or she shall be released.   HB3468- 40 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1        (4) In no event may the treatment period be extended 2    to exceed the maximum sentence to which a defendant would 3    have been subject had the defendant he or she been 4    convicted in the a criminal proceeding on the most serious 5    offense. For purposes of this Section, the maximum 6    sentence shall be determined by Section 5-8-1 (730 ILCS 7    5/5-8-1) or Article 4.5 of Chapter V of the "Unified Code 8    of Corrections", excluding any sentence of natural life.9        (5) If the treatment supervisor reports the defendant 10    as fit, the court shall immediately, within 48 hours, 11    order the sheriff to return the defendant to the county 12    jail to stand trial, plead, or be sentenced. 13(Source: P.A. 95-1052, eff. 7-1-09.) 14    (725 ILCS 5/104-26)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-26)15    Sec. 104-26. Disposition of Defendants suffering 16disabilities. 17    (a) A defendant convicted following a trial conducted 18under the provisions of Section 104-22 shall not be sentenced 19before a written presentence report of investigation is 20presented to and considered by the court. The presentence 21report shall be prepared pursuant to Sections 5-3-2, 5-3-3 and 225-3-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections, as now or hereafter 23amended, and shall include a physical and mental examination 24unless the court finds that the reports of prior physical and 25mental examinations conducted pursuant to this Article are   HB3468- 41 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1adequate and recent enough so that additional examinations 2would be unnecessary.3    (b) (Blank).4    (c) A defendant convicted following a trial under Section 5104-22 shall be sentenced according to the procedures and 6dispositions authorized under the Unified Code of Corrections, 7as now or hereafter amended, subject to the following 8provisions:9        (1) The court shall not impose a sentence of 10    imprisonment upon the offender if the court believes that 11    due to the presence of a because of his disability, a 12    sentence of imprisonment would not serve the ends of 13    justice and the interests of society and the offender or 14    that because of a his disability, a sentence of 15    imprisonment would subject the offender to excessive 16    hardship. In addition to any other conditions of a 17    sentence of conditional discharge or probation, the court 18    may require that the offender undergo treatment 19    appropriate for the defendant's to his mental or physical 20    condition.21        (2) (Blank). After imposing a sentence of imprisonment 22    upon an offender who has a mental disability, the court 23    may remand him to the custody of the Department of Human 24    Services and order a hearing to be conducted pursuant to 25    the provisions of the Mental Health and Developmental 26    Disabilities Code, as now or hereafter amended. If the   HB3468- 42 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    offender is committed following such hearing, he shall be 2    treated in the same manner as any other civilly committed 3    patient for all purposes except as provided in this 4    Section. If the defendant is not committed pursuant to 5    such hearing, he shall be remanded to the sentencing court 6    for disposition according to the sentence imposed.7        (3) If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment 8    upon an offender who has a mental disability but does not 9    proceed under subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of this 10    Section, it shall order the Department of Corrections to 11    proceed pursuant to Section 3-8-5 of the Unified Code of 12    Corrections, as now or hereafter amended.13        (3.5) If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment 14    upon an offender who has a mental disability, it the court 15    shall direct the clerk of the circuit court circuit court 16    clerk to immediately notify the Illinois State Police, 17    Firearm Owner's Identification (FOID) Office, in a form 18    and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police and 19    shall forward a copy of the court order to the Department. 20        (4) If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment 21    upon an offender who has a physical disability, it may 22    authorize the Department of Corrections to place the 23    offender in a public or private facility which is able to 24    provide care or treatment for the offender's disability 25    and which agrees to do so.26        (5) When an offender is placed with the Department of   HB3468- 43 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    Human Services or another facility pursuant to 2    subparagraph (2) or (4) of this paragraph (c), the public 3    or Department or private facility shall not discharge or 4    allow the offender to be at large in the community without 5    prior approval of the court. If the defendant is placed in 6    the custody of the Department of Human Services, the 7    defendant shall be placed in a secure setting unless the 8    court determines that there are compelling reasons why 9    such placement is not necessary. The offender shall accrue 10    all good time credits as determined by the court while in 11    the custody of the public or private facility and shall be 12    eligible for parole in the same manner as if the offender 13    he were serving the defendant's his sentence within the 14    Department of Corrections. If the sentence has not yet 15    expired when When the offender no longer requires 16    hospitalization, care, or treatment, the public or private 17    Department of Human Services or the facility shall 18    transfer the offender him, if his sentence has not 19    expired, to the Department of Corrections. If an offender 20    is transferred to the Department of Corrections, the 21    facility Department of Human Services shall transfer to 22    the Department of Corrections all related records 23    pertaining to length of custody and treatment services 24    provided during the time the offender was held.25        (6) The Department of Corrections shall notify the 26    public or private Department of Human Services or a   HB3468- 44 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1    facility in which an offender has been placed pursuant to 2    subparagraph (2) or (4) of paragraph (c) of this Section 3    of the expiration of the his sentence. Thereafter, an 4    offender so placed in the Department of Human Services 5    shall continue to be treated pursuant to the defendant's 6    his commitment order and shall be considered a civilly 7    committed patient for all purposes including discharge. An 8    offender who is in a facility pursuant to subparagraph (4) 9    of paragraph (c) of this Section shall be informed by the 10    facility of the expiration of the defendant's his 11    sentence, and shall either consent to the continuation of 12    the defendant's his care or treatment by the facility, or 13    shall be discharged.14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (725 ILCS 5/104-27 rep.)16    (725 ILCS 5/104-28 rep.)17    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 18amended by repealing Sections 104-27 and 104-28.  HB3468- 45 -LRB104 10125 RLC 20197 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    725 ILCS 5/102-24 new4    725 ILCS 5/102-25 new5    725 ILCS 5/104-10from Ch. 38, par. 104-106    725 ILCS 5/104-11from Ch. 38, par. 104-117    725 ILCS 5/104-13from Ch. 38, par. 104-138    725 ILCS 5/104-14from Ch. 38, par. 104-149    725 ILCS 5/104-15from Ch. 38, par. 104-1510    725 ILCS 5/104-16from Ch. 38, par. 104-1611    725 ILCS 5/104-17from Ch. 38, par. 104-1712    725 ILCS 5/104-18from Ch. 38, par. 104-1813    725 ILCS 5/104-19from Ch. 38, par. 104-1914    725 ILCS 5/104-20from Ch. 38, par. 104-2015    725 ILCS 5/104-21from Ch. 38, par. 104-2116    725 ILCS 5/104-22from Ch. 38, par. 104-2217    725 ILCS 5/104-23from Ch. 38, par. 104-2318    725 ILCS 5/104-24from Ch. 38, par. 104-2419    725 ILCS 5/104-25from Ch. 38, par. 104-2520    725 ILCS 5/104-26from Ch. 38, par. 104-2621    725 ILCS 5/104-27 rep.22    725 ILCS 5/104-28 rep.